Utah statutes.
53A-19-102.   Local school boards budget procedures.
(1) (a)  Prior to June 22 of each year, each local school board shall adopt a
budget and make appropriations for the next fiscal year.
(b)  If the tax rate in the proposed budget exceeds the certified tax rate
defined in Section 59-2-924, the board shall comply with Section 59-2-919 in
adopting the budget, except as provided by Section 53A-17a-133.
(2) (a)  Prior to the adoption of a budget containing a tax rate which does
not exceed the certified tax rate, the board shall hold a public hearing, as
defined in Section 10-9a-103, on the proposed budget.
(b)  In addition to complying with Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public
Meetings Act, in regards to the public hearing described in Subsection (2)(a),
the board shall:
(i)  publish the required newspaper notice at least 10 days before the day on
which the hearing is held; and
(ii)  file a copy of the proposed budget with the board's business
administrator for public inspection at least 10 days prior to the hearing.
(3)  The board shall file a copy of the adopted budget with the state auditor
and the State Board of Education.
